Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Revision of title. —

Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

15-1-101

to 15-11-18 as

15-1-101

to

15-10-117

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1980 Act have been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they would be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 2, reads: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict.” Section 3, ch. 38, Laws 1980, makes the act effective on January 1, 1981.